Maine, session 132, LD2050.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Great Salt Bay Community School District dissolved.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Great Salt Bay Community
School District is dissolved.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2732(03)